Maryland, session 2025, HB1124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1104.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY” MEANS THE
LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT OR COUNTY AGENCY THAT HAS RECEIVED A WELL OR
ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO DORCHESTER COUNTY.
(C) (1) AT THE REQUEST OF A COUNTY GOVERNMENT AND THE
DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH A
PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF ANY ACTIVITIES ASSOCIATED
WITH A WELL OR ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY
BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHES A PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
– 1 –

Ch. 425 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) SPECIFY WHETHER THE PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM HAS A
LIMITED DURATION OR IS ONGOING;
(II) SPECIFY THE ACTIVITIES ASSOCIATED WITH A WELL OR
ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY COVERED UNDER
THE PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM;
(III) ESTABLISH REPORTING AND PERFORMANCE MONITORING
REQUIREMENTS, AS DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(IV) CONDUCT MANDATORY COMPLIANCE AUDITS ON AT LEAST
AN ANNUAL BASIS; AND
(V) CONSIDER REASONABLE CONSUMER PROTECTION
REQUIREMENTS, INCLUDING FEE CAPS AND DISPUTE RESOLUTION MECHANISMS;
(VI) REQUIRE THAT PARTICIPANTS IN THE PRIVATIZATION
PROGRAM CARRY APPROPRIATE INSURANCE AND PROVIDE FINANCIAL
ASSURANCES, INCLUDING INDEMNIFICATION OF THE STATE, AND BONDS, LETTERS
OF CREDIT, OR SIMILAR FINANCIAL SECURITY, THE AMOUNTS OF WHICH SHALL BE
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(VII) ENSURE THAT THE PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM COMPLIES
WITH APPLICABLE PROCUREMENT LAWS;
(VIII) ESTABLISH APPROPRIATE ETHICS POLICIES, INCLUDING
CONFLICT OF INTEREST STANDARDS, FOR THE PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM; AND
(IX) REQUIRE PARTICIPANTS IN THE PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM
TO TRANSFER ANY RECORDS RELATED TO THE PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM TO THE
DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY, AT WHICH TIME THE RECORDS SHALL BE
CONSIDERED PUBLIC RECORDS SUBJECT TO TITLE 4 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE (THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT).
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY SUSPEND OR HALT A PRIVATIZATION
PROGRAM IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE PROGRAM:
(I) IS FAILING TO COMPLY WITH ANY REQUIREMENT
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) IS FAILING TO MEET REPORTING OR PERFORMANCE
MONITORING REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 425
(III) POSES A RISK TO PUBLIC HEALTH OR THE ENVIRONMENT.
(D) IN ORDER TO BE ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION, A PERSON MUST:
(1) BE AN ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALIST LICENSED IN BY
THE STATE;
(2) HAVE DEMONSTRATED SATISFACTORY EXPERIENCE IN THE
ACTIVITIES ASSOCIATED WITH A WELL OR ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM
DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY COVERED UNDER THE PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM; AND
(3) MEET ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OR REQUESTED BY THE DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY TO
ENSURE THE QUALITY OF THE WORK PERFORMED UNDER THE PRIVATIZATION
PROGRAM.
(E) THE DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY SHALL REVIEW AND APPROVE
OR DISAPPROVE ANY WORK PERFORMED BY A PERSON UNDER A PRIVATIZATION
PROGRAM, CONSISTENT WITH THE DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(F) A DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY SEEKING TO ESTABLISH A
PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL WORK WITH THE
DEPARTMENT AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT TO IMPLEMENT THE PRIVATIZATION
PROGRAM.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE
PRIVATIZATION PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –